Wyoming statutes. Title 12 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 2. Revocation Procedure

§ 12-7-201.
Civil action; administrative and judicial proceedings; disposition of liquors.

An action to revoke any Wyoming liquor license or permit may be brought in the name of the state of Wyoming by the attorney general, any county attorney or the licensing authority for the reason that the licensee or permittee has violated this title.

Actions to revoke licenses are civil actions and shall be tried before the court without a jury. The revocation proceedings shall be in accordance with the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure, and the trial and all other matters to come before the court shall have a priority upon the court calendar. If, upon trial, it appears that the license or permit of the licensee should be revoked, the court shall enter its order accordingly. The court may revoke the license or permit upon proof that the intent and purpose of this title has been violated. The fact that no criminal proceeding has been instituted or that no law with sanctions has been violated is not a defense to the action. Upon the application of the state and upon a showing to the satisfaction of the court that there are probable grounds for believing the license holder’s license should be revoked, the court may issue an order suspending a license during the pendency of an action for its revocation and no bond shall be required as a condition to the issuance of the suspension order. Appeal from the final district court decision may be taken according to the Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure, but the order of revocation shall remain in effect pending a decision by the appellate court.

The provisions of this section are cumulative and shall not be construed as preventing the division from revoking a liquor license in any case authorized by law.

The division may revoke any license or permit issued under this title for violation of any of the rules and regulations promulgated by the department pursuant to this title or for violation of any of the provisions of this title. Prior to suspension or final revocation of a license or permit under this chapter the division shall issue at least two (2) written notices of the intent to revoke or suspend the license or permit to the licensee. The notices shall be provided at least one (1) week apart and the final notice shall be provided at least thirty (30) days prior to any suspension or revocation. The notice shall identify the violation warranting revocation or suspension of the license or permit, the date when it will be suspended or revoked and the ability to appeal and to continue to operate as provided in this subsection. Unless the division orders otherwise, a licensee may continue to operate under the license or permit pending an appeal of a license suspension or revocation to the state board of equalization made under this subsection. Any appeal shall be filed with the state board of equalization not more than thirty (30) days following the suspension or revocation of the license or permit. Appeals before the state board shall be conducted as a contested case under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act and the state board shall either affirm or deny the action taken by the division. The state board may affirm an order of immediate suspension of a license or permit if the division demonstrates that the licensee should not be permitted to operate pending the outcome of an appeal made under this subsection. The decision of the state board shall be subject to judicial review under W.S.

16-3-114

except that the review shall not operate to stay a revocation or suspension order of the division during the pendency of the district court proceeding or during a later appeal to the supreme court. Should the license or permit of a licensee expire during the pendency of an appeal before the state board or in any of the courts of this state, no new or renewal license shall be granted by the licensing authority to the licensee or any other person pending the outcome of the appeal.

Upon the final revocation of a liquor license or permit, all alcoholic liquors in the possession of the license holder and which are in merchantable condition shall be delivered to the division which shall reimburse the license holder for the value thereof at its then regular wholesale prices. All malt beverages and nonmerchantable alcoholic liquors shall be disposed of at the direction of the division.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 87, § 31; ch. 117, § 2; 1939, ch. 109, § 1; 1945, ch. 132, §§ 1-5; ch. 133, § 6; C.S. 1945, §§ 53-102, 53-231; W.S. 1957, §§ 12-29, 12-39(m); W.S. 1977, § 12-2-131; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1983, ch. 143, § 1; 1996, ch. 74, § 2; 2016 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 24, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

As to selling adulterated or spoiled liquor, see §§

35-7-111

to

35-7-113

.

As to entering while intoxicated, or taking intoxicants into, mines, mills or factories, see §

35-10-402

.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “division” for “commission” throughout (c) through (e).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (d), substituted “Prior to suspension….an appeal made under this subsection” for “Revocation proceedings initiated by the division shall be conducted as a contested case under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act before a hearing examiner of the office of administrative hearings, who shall recommend a decision to the division”; in the second to last sentence substituted “state board” for “division” and added “or suspension” following “revocation”; in the last sentence added “or permit” following “license”, added “before the state board or” following appeal, and substituted “licensee” for “defendant” twice; and in (e), added “final” preceding “revocation” in the first sentence.

Construction.—

Gross violation of Title 12 will necessarily violate the intent and purpose of Title 12. Thus, it remains true that the court may revoke the license or permit upon proof that the intent and purpose of Title 12 has been violated, subject to the qualification that the violation be gross. Therefore, a court must conclude that a licensee committed a gross violation of Title 12 before it can revoke a liquor license. Mattheis Co. v. Town of Jackson, 2019 WY 78, 444 P.3d 1268,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 2019).

Violation shown.—

District court did not err in holding a licensee committed a gross violation of Title 12, despite its asserted reliance on the advice of counsel, where it knowingly submitted a false application under penalty of perjury about having a one-year lease. Mattheis Co. v. Town of Jackson, 2019 WY 78, 444 P.3d 1268,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 2019).

District court did not abuse its discretion in revoking the liquor license as it understood its discretion and considered the evidence and nature of the violation in determining that suspension was not a meaningful consequence of the licensee’s false statement on the application regarding a one year lease. Mattheis Co. v. Town of Jackson, 2019 WY 78, 444 P.3d 1268,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 2019).

Right to hearing and review pertaining to issuance or renewal of liquor license

exists only: (1) to those people and residents referred to in § 12-4-104(b)(i) and (iv) for the purposes there set forth; and (2) to matters involving the revocation or suspension of such licenses by the Wyoming liquor commission pursuant to subsection (d) of this section. Walker v. Board of County Comm'rs, 644 P.2d 772,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 336

(Wyo. 1982).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administrative Law, Wyoming Style,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 223 (1983).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right to hearing before revocation or suspension of liquor license, 35 ALR2d 1067.